California statutes. Business and Professions Code
A licensee or registrant shall give written notice to the board of a name change, giving both the old and new names. The written notice shall be submitted to the board within 30 days of the issuance of a new government-issued photographic identification. The licensee or registrant shall certify the information by signing a statement under penalty of perjury. A copy of both of the following documents evidencing the change shall be submitted with the notice:

(a) A current government-issued photographic identification.

(b) The legal document authorizing the name change, such as a court order or a marriage
 certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 9.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Marriage and Family Therapy Corporations [4987.5. - 4988.2.]

4987.5.

A marriage and family therapy corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, and any other statute or regulation pertaining to that corporation and the conduct of its affairs. With respect to a marriage and family therapy corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 32.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4987.6.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 657, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4987.7.

The name of a marriage and family therapy corporation shall contain one or more of the words “marriage,” “family,” or “child” together with one or more of the words “counseling,” “counselor,” “therapy,” or “therapist,” and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence. A marriage and family therapy corporation that conducts business under a fictitious business name shall not use any name that is false, misleading or deceptive, and shall inform the patient, prior to the commencement of treatment, that the business is conducted by a marriage and family therapy corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 204, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4987.8.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of a marriage and family therapy corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4988.

The income of a marriage and family therapy corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of that shareholder or his or her shares in the marriage and family therapy corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4988.1.

A marriage and family therapy corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by statutes, rules and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license as a marriage and family therapist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4988.2.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including rules and regulations requiring (a) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a marriage and family therapy corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within the time that rules and regulations may provide, and (b) that a marriage and family therapy corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Review [4989. - 4989.]

4989.

The powers and duties of the board, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to the review required by Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 473). The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to become inoperative on July 1, 2005, and would be repealed as of January 1, 2006, as described in Section 473.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 589, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13.5. Licensed Educational Psychologists [4989.10. - 4989.70.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [4989.10. - 4989.18.]

4989.10.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as, the Educational Psychologist Practice Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.12.

The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter it shall be designated as the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.13.

A person engages in the practice of educational psychology when he or she performs or offers to perform or holds himself or herself out as able to perform this service for remuneration in any form, including donations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 148, Sec. 2.   (SB 274)   Effective August 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.14.

(a) The practice of educational psychology is the performance of any of the following professional functions pertaining to academic learning processes or the educational system or both:

(1) Educational evaluation.

(2) Diagnosis of psychological disorders related to academic learning processes.

(3) Administration of diagnostic tests related to academic learning processes including tests of academic ability, learning patterns, achievement, motivation, and personality factors.

(4) Interpretation of diagnostic tests related to academic learning processes including tests of
 academic ability, learning patterns, achievement, motivation, and personality factors.

(5) Providing psychological counseling for individuals, groups, and families.

(6) Consultation with other educators and parents on issues of social development and behavioral and academic difficulties.

(7) Conducting psychoeducational assessments for the purposes of identifying special needs.

(8) Developing treatment programs and strategies to address problems of adjustment.

(9) Coordinating intervention strategies for management of individual crises.

(b) For purposes of supervising an associate marriage and family therapist or a marriage
 and family therapist trainee pursuant to Section 4980.03, an associate clinical social worker pursuant to Section 4996.20, or an associate professional clinical counselor pursuant to Section 4999.12, “educationally related mental health services” are mental health services provided to clients who have social, emotional, or behavioral issues that interfere with their educational progress. These services include all of the following:

(1) Educationally related counseling services to clients qualified for special education that are necessary to receive a free appropriate public education in the least restrictive environment pursuant to the federal requirements of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) Intensive counseling services on a continuum that may reflect an increase in frequency, duration, or staff specialization to address the client’s emotional and
 behavioral needs.

(3) Counseling services provided by qualified practitioners.

(4) Parent counseling and training.

(5) Psychological services that include consulting with staff members in planning school programs to meet the client’s educational needs and assisting in developing positive behavioral intervention strategies for the client.

(6) Social work services such as preparing a social or developmental history on a client with a disability.

(7) Group and individualized counseling with the client and family.

(8) Mobilizing school and community resources to enable the client to learn as effectively as possible in their
 educational program, as outlined in Section 300.34 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 59.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.16.

(a) A person appropriately credentialed by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing may perform the functions authorized by that credential in a public school without a license issued under this chapter by the board.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to constrict, limit, or withdraw the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)), the Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700)), the Psychology Licensing Law (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900)), the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Practice Act (Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980)), the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section
 4991)), or the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act (Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 316, Sec. 25.   (SB 1466)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.17.

(a) A licensee shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychological services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: 

NOTICE TO CLIENTS

The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of licensed educational psychologists. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.

(b) On and after July 1, 2025, upon
 initiation of psychological services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s full name as filed with the board, the license number, the type of license, and the license expiration date. 

(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 6.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.18.

The board may, by rules or regulations, adopt, amend, or repeal rules of professional conduct appropriate to the establishment and maintenance of a high standard of integrity and dignity in the profession, provided those rules or regulations are not inconsistent with Section 4989.54. Every person licensed under this chapter shall be governed by those rules of professional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licensure [4989.20. - 4989.28.]

4989.20.

(a) The board may issue a license as an educational psychologist if the applicant satisfies, with proof satisfactory to the board, the following requirements:

(1) Possession of, at minimum, a master’s degree in psychology, educational psychology, school psychology, counseling and guidance, or a degree deemed equivalent by the board. This degree shall be obtained from an educational institution approved by the board according to the regulations adopted under this chapter.

(2) Attainment of 18 years of age.

(3) Is not subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section
 480.

(4) Successful completion of 60 semester units or 90 quarter units of postgraduate study in pupil personnel services.

(5) Two school terms of full-time, or the equivalent to full-time, experience as a licensed or credentialed school psychologist in the public schools or in another school setting as specified in regulations. The experience shall be gained over a period of at least two school terms. The applicant shall not be credited with
 experience obtained more than six years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.

(6) If the experience required by paragraph (5) was completed while holding a California credential in a school located in California, completion of one of the following:

(A) A minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised professional experience in an accredited school psychology program.

(B) One school term of full-time, or the equivalent to full-time, experience as a California credentialed school psychologist in the California public schools, or in another school setting as specified in regulations, obtained under the direction of a California-licensed educational psychologist.
 The experience shall be gained over a period of at least one school term. The applicant shall not be credited with experience obtained more than six years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.

(7) If the experience required by paragraph (5) was not completed while holding a California credential in a school located in California, completion of one of the following:

(A) A minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised professional experience gained in California in an accredited school psychology program, gained no more than six years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.

(B) One school term of full-time, or
 the equivalent to full-time, experience as a California credentialed school psychologist in the California public schools, or in another school setting as specified in regulations, obtained under the direction of a California licensed educational psychologist. The experience shall be gained over a period of at least one school term. The applicant shall not be credited with experience obtained more than six years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.

(8) Passage of the licensed educational psychologist written examination administered by the board. A passing score on this examination shall be accepted by the board for a period of seven years from the date the examination was taken.

(b) For purposes of this section, the
 following definitions apply:

(1) “Full time” means the days or hours of creditable service the employer requires to be performed by the employee in a school term under their collective bargaining agreement or employment agreement. It shall consist of a minimum of 175 days, or 1,050 hours, per school term.

(2) “Equivalent to full time” means the days or hours of creditable service that a person who is employed on a part-time basis would be required to perform in a school term if they were employed full time in that part-time position.

(3) “School term” means a minimum period of 35 weeks beginning the first day and ending the last day creditable service is required to be performed by a member employed on a full-time basis,
 excluding any period that has been excluded pursuant to a publicly available written contractual agreement. The school term shall also be the same for an individual who is not employed on a full-time basis who is performing the same duties as a member employed on a full-time basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 69.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.22.

(a) Only persons who satisfy the requirements of Section 4989.20 are eligible to take the licensure examination.

(b) An applicant who fails the written examination may, within one year from the notification date of failure, retake the examination as regularly scheduled without further application. Thereafter, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until the applicant files a new application, meets all current requirements, and pays all fees required.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may destroy all examination materials two years after the date of an examination.

(d) The board shall not deny any applicant, whose application for licensure is complete, admission to the written examination, nor shall the board postpone or delay any applicant’s written examination, solely upon the receipt by the board of a complaint alleging acts or conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 135, the board may deny any applicant who has previously failed the written examination permission to retake the examination pending completion of the investigation of any complaint against the applicant. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying an applicant admission to any examination, withholding the results, or refusing to issue a license to any applicant when an accusation or statement of issues has been
 filed against the applicant pursuant to Section 11503 or 11504 of the Government Code, or the applicant has been denied in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 485.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 69.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.23.

(a) On or after January 1, 2021, an applicant for licensure as an educational psychologist shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of their qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the registrar or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included
 within the institution’s curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained as part of their applied experience. Applied experience can be met in any of the following settings: practicum, supervised experience gained pursuant to Section 4989.20, formal postdoctoral placement that meets the requirements of Section 2911, or other qualifying supervised experience. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the director of training for the program or primary supervisor where the qualifying experience has occurred stating that the training required by this section is included within the applied experience.

(3) By taking a continuing education
 course that meets the requirements of Section 4989.34. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) As a one-time requirement, a licensee prior to the time of their first renewal after January 1, 2021, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active license status on or after January 1, 2021, shall have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention, using one of the methods specified in subdivision (a). Proof of compliance with this section shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 29.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.23.1.

(a) On or after July 1, 2023, an applicant for licensure as an educational psychologist shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of three hours of training or coursework in the provision of mental health services via telehealth, which shall include law and ethics related to telehealth. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of their qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the registrar or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s
 curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained by completing a continuing education course that meets the requirements of Section 4989.34. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) As a one-time requirement, a licensee before the time of their first renewal after July 1, 2023, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active license status on or after July 1, 2023, shall have completed a minimum of three hours of training or coursework in the provision of mental health services via telehealth, which shall include law and ethics related to telehealth, using one of the methods specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Proof of compliance with subdivision
 (b) shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 6.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.24.

(a) The board shall not issue a license to a person who has been convicted of a crime in this or any other state or in a territory of the United States that involves sexual abuse of children or who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code or the equivalent in another state or territory.

(b) A denial issued pursuant to this section shall comply with the conditions for denial specified in Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 35.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.26.

The board may refuse to issue a license to an applicant if it appears he or she may be unable to practice safely due to mental illness or chemical dependency. The procedures set forth in Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 shall apply to a denial of a license pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.28.

The board may deny an application for licensure if the applicant is or has been guilty of unprofessional conduct as described in Section 4989.54.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Renewal and Continuing Education [4989.30. - 4989.45.]

4989.30.

A license issued under this chapter shall expire no later than 24 months after its date of issue. The expiration date of the original license shall be set by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.32.

To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the expiration date of the license, take all of the following actions:

(a) Apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(b) Pay a two-year renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(c) Inform the board of whether the licensee has been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of any misdemeanor or felony and whether any disciplinary action has been taken by a regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state after the prior issuance or renewal of a license.

(d) Complete the continuing
 education requirements described in Section 4989.34.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 36.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.34.

(a) To renew a license, a licensee shall certify to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, completion in the preceding two years of not less than 36 hours of approved continuing education in, or relevant to, educational psychology.

(b) (1) The continuing education shall be obtained from either an accredited university or a continuing education provider as specified by the board by regulation.

(2) The board shall establish, by regulation, a procedure identifying acceptable providers of continuing education courses, and all providers of continuing education shall comply with procedures established by the board. The board may revoke or deny the right of a provider to offer
 continuing education coursework pursuant to this section for failure to comply with this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in menopausal mental health.

(2) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in maternal mental health.

(d) Training, education, and coursework by approved providers shall incorporate one or more of the following:

(1) Aspects of the discipline that are fundamental to the understanding or the practice of educational psychology.

(2) Aspects of the discipline of educational psychology in which significant recent developments have occurred.

(3) Aspects of other disciplines that enhance the understanding or the practice of educational psychology.

(e) The board may audit the records of a licensee to verify completion of the continuing education requirement. A licensee shall maintain records of the completion of required continuing education coursework for a minimum of two years and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon its request.

(f) The board may establish exceptions from the continuing education requirements of this section for good cause, as determined by the board.

(g) The continuing education requirements of this section shall comply fully with the guidelines for mandatory continuing education established by the Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant to Section 166.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 836, Sec. 5.5.   (AB 2581)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.36.

A licensee may renew a license that has expired at any time within three years after its expiration date by taking all of the actions described in Section 4989.32 and by paying the delinquency fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 38.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.38.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 39.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.40.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article and shall not be renewed. The applicant may apply to the board for reinstatement of their license. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee shall, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 40.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.42.

A license that is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter. A former licensee may apply for a new license if he or she satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists that, if the license were issued, would constitute grounds for its revocation or suspension.

(b) Payment of the fees that would be required if he or she were applying for a license for the first time.

(c) Passage of the current licensure examination.

(d) He or she complies with the fingerprint requirements established by board regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 46.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.44.

(a) A licensee may apply to the board to request that his or her license be placed on inactive status.

(b) A licensee on inactive status shall be subject to this chapter and shall not engage in the practice of educational psychology in this state.

(c) A licensee who holds an inactive license shall pay a biennial fee of one-half of the amount of the standard renewal fee.

(d) A licensee on inactive status who has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure may, upon request, restore his or her license to practice educational psychology to active status. A licensee requesting that his or her license be placed on active status between renewal cycles shall pay the remaining one-half of his or her renewal fee. A licensee requesting to restore his or her license to active status, whose license will expire less than one year from the date of the request, shall complete 18 hours of continuing education as specified in Section 4989.34. A licensee requesting to restore his or her license to active status, whose license will expire more than one year from the date of the request, shall complete 36 hours of continuing education as specified in Section 4989.34.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 586, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.45.

(a) (1) The board shall issue, upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, a retired license to a licensed educational psychologist who holds a license that is current and active or a license that is inactive, and whose license is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(2) A licensed educational psychologist license that has expired shall be issued a retired license by the board upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter if all of
 the following requirements are met:

(A) The license expired within three years from the date of the board’s receipt of a completed application.

(B) Immediately preceding the license expiration, and after the license expiration, the license was not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(3) For purposes of this section, “subject to disciplinary action” shall mean that the licensee had an unsatisfied cost recovery, fine or restitution order, an accusation or petition to revoke probation that has been served on the licensee alleging violations of their probation or the chapter, or an unresolved complaint or investigation pending with the
 board.

(b) To apply for a retired license, the applicant shall submit a completed application to the board providing all of the following information:

(1) Full name as filed with the board.

(2) Board license type, license number, and expiration date.

(3) Date of birth.

(4) Social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(5) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant understands that the holder of a retired license may not
 engage in any activity for which the active license was issued, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to retired status. 

(c) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active educational psychologist license is required.

(d) The holder of a retired license shall utilize their professional title only with the unabbreviated word “retired” directly preceding or directly following the professional title. 

(e) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(f) The holder of a retired license may apply to restore to active status their
 license to practice educational psychology if that retired license was issued less than three years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. A retired license may be restored to active status one time only. To restore a retired license to active status, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Submit a completed application to the board containing all of the following information:

(A) Full name as filed with the board.

(B) Original board license type and original license number and expiration date.

(C) Date of birth.

(D) Social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(E) Whether they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state subsequent to the issuance of the retired license.

(F) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant did not engage in any activity for which an active license is required while the license was in retired status, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to “active” status. 

(2) Has not committed an act or crime constituting
 grounds for denial of licensure.

(3) Pays the renewal fee required by this chapter.

(4) Completes the required continuing education as specified in Section 4989.34.

(5) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established in Section 144.

(g) An applicant requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section less than one year from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 18 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by
 the board. This coursework shall include a minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(h) An applicant requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section one or more years from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 36 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. This coursework shall include a minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(i) A retired license that was issued three or more years prior shall not be restored. The holder of the retired license may apply for and obtain a new license if all of
 the following criteria are
 satisfied:

(1) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure.

(2) Applies for licensure and pays the required fee.

(3) Passes the examinations required for licensure.

(4) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established in Section 144.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 70.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Regulation [4989.46. - 4989.52.]

4989.46.

A licensee shall give written notice to the board of a name change, providing both the old and new names. The written notice shall be submitted to the board within 30 days of the issuance of a new government-issued photographic identification. The licensee shall certify the information is correct by signing a statement under penalty of perjury. A copy of both of the following documents evidencing the change shall be submitted with the notice:

(a) A current government-issued photographic identification.

(b) The legal document authorizing the name change, such as a court order or a marriage
 certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 10.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.47.

Any licensed educational psychologist who conducts a private practice under a fictitious business name shall not use any name that is false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall inform the patient, prior to the commencement of treatment, of the name and license designation of the owner or owners of the practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 41.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.48.

A licensee shall display their license in a conspicuous place in the licensee’s primary place of practice when rendering professional clinical services in person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 7.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.49.

“Advertising,” as used in this chapter, includes, but is not limited to, any public communication as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 651, the issuance of any card, sign, or device to any person, or the causing, permitting, or allowing of any sign or marking on, or in, any building or structure, or in any newspaper, magazine, or directory, or any printed matter whatsoever, with or without any limiting qualification. Signs within religious buildings or notices in bulletins from a religious organization mailed to a congregation are not advertising within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 71.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.50.

Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to practice educational psychology or use any title or letters that imply that he or she is a licensed educational psychologist unless, at the time of so doing, he or she holds a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked license issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.51.
